src/numeral-sma-lex.txt
LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG                            !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
! +N: ROMNUMTAG ;                         !^C^ !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;                             !

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like "Kapihtal II-IV".
! We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and get the +Num tag), or we may
! send them through a second loop, identical to the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica
! are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases
! like "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would do the
! trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT                            !^C^
 +Use/Circ:%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc.                    !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN                                !^C^
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ;                         !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ;                                  !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;                                  !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND                       !^C^
 M+Use/Circ:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                     !
 MM+Use/Circ:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                     !
 MMM+Use/Circ:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                 !
 MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                 !
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                 !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG                    !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ;   !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED                        !^C^
 C+Use/Circ:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CC+Use/Circ:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CCC+Use/Circ:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CD+Use/Circ:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 D+Use/Circ:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DC+Use/Circ:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DCC+Use/Circ:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                 !
 CM+Use/Circ:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG                    !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ;                                 !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;!
LEXICON 2ROM-TEN                               !^C^
 X+Use/Circ:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                           !
 XX+Use/Circ:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                          !
 XXX+Use/Circ:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 XL+Use/Circ:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                          !
 L+Use/Circ:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                           !
 LX+Use/Circ:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                          !
 LXX+Use/Circ:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                        !
 XC+Use/Circ:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG;                          !

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG                           !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                               !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;                                 !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE                               !^C^
 I+Use/Circ:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                           !
 II+Use/Circ:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                          !
 III+Use/Circ:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 IV+Use/Circ:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 V+Use/Circ:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                           !
 VI+Use/Circ:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                          !
 VII+Use/Circ:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                        !
 IX+Use/Circ:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG;                          !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG                           !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                               !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG                              !^C^
 +Num+Nom+Use/Circ:%> # ;                              !
 +Num+Gen+Use/Circ:%> # ;                              !
 +Num+Acc+Use/Circ:%> # ;                              !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%.%> # ;                              ! !III. as ordinal.
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%> # ;                                ! !Looking for trouble...
 +Num+Use/Circ:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL ;                     !
 +Num+Use/Circ:'7 ROMNUMTAGOBL ;                     !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%- ROMNUMTAGOBL ;                     !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL ;                     !
! +Num:   ROMNUMTAGOBL ;                     !^C^

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL                           !^C^
 +Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>n # ; ! ! But here 123a 123
 +Acc+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>m # ; !                                 !
 +Ill+Use/Circ:%>ese # ;                                  ! 
 +Ine+Use/Circ:%>esne # ;                                  !
 +Ine+Attr+Use/Circ:%>ene # ;                                  !
 +Ela+Attr+Use/Circ:%>ede # ;                                  !
 +Ela+Use/Circ:%>este # ;                                  !
 +Com+Use/Circ:%>ine # ;                                 !
 +Ess+Use/Circ:%>in # ;                                  !

LEXICON NUMBERLIKE
 gellie+Num+Sg:gell           N_IE_SG ; ! as sme máŋga
gellie+Num+Sg+Ine+Attr:gelle%>ne # ;
gellie+Num+Sg+Ela+Attr:gelle%>de              # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !


LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP                        !^C^
 ½+Num+Use/Circ:½ # ;                                 !
 ¹+Num+Use/Circ:¹ # ;                                 !
 ²+Num+Use/Circ:² # ;                                 !
 ³+Num+Use/Circ:³ # ;                                 !
 ¼+Num+Use/Circ:¼ # ;                                 !
¾+Num:¾ # ;


LEXICON COLLECTIVE    !Some collective numbers that do not fit in anywhere else
gööktege+Num+Coll:göökteg ORDTAGODD ;
golmege+Num+Coll:golmeg  ORDTAGODD ;
gåalmege+Num+Coll:gåalmag  ORDTAGODD ;
njealjege+Num+Coll:njealjag  ORDTAGODD ;
vïjhtege+Num+Coll:vïjhteg  ORDTAGODD ;
govhtege+Num+Coll:govhteg  ORDTAGODD ;
tjïjhtjege+Num+Coll:tjïjhtjeg  ORDTAGODD ;
gaaktsege+Num+Coll:gaaktsag  ORDTAGODD ;
uktsege+Num+Coll:uktsieg  ORDTAGODD ;
låhkege+Num+Coll:låhkag  ORDTAGODD ;

LEXICON 2TO9LUHKIE
göökte# LUHKIE- ;
golme# LUHKIE- ;
njieljie# LUHKIE- ;
njielje# LUHKIE- ;
nieljie# LUHKIE- ;
nielje# LUHKIE- ;
vïjhte# LUHKIE- ;
govhte# LUHKIE- ;
tjïjhtje# LUHKIE- ;
gaektsie# LUHKIE- ;
uktsie# LUHKIE- ;

LEXICON 2TO9TJUETIE
göökte# GTJUETIE ;
golme# GTJUETIE ;
njieljie# GTJUETIE ;
njielje# GTJUETIE ;
nieljie# GTJUETIE ;
nielje# GTJUETIE ;
vïjhte# GTJUETIE ;
govhte# GTJUETIE ;
tjïjhtje# GTJUETIE ;
gaektsie# GTJUETIE ;
uktsie# GTJUETIE ;

LEXICON GTJUETIE
tjuetie LUHKIEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
tjuetie# AKTEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuetie FINAL1 ;
tjuetie:tjuet NUMTAGie ;
tjuatede+A+Ord:tjuatad ORDTAGODD ;
nïmme LUHKIEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nïmme# AKTEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9F ;
nïmme:nïmm NUMTAGe ;
nymme LUHKIEF ;
nymme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nymme# AKTEF ;
nymme# 2TO9F ;
nymme:nymm NUMTAGe ;
nomme LUHKIEF ;
nomme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nomme# AKTEF ;
nomme# 2TO9F ;
nomme:nomm NUMTAGe ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoere#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoere#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoere#luhkie:stoere#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoerre#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoerre#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoerre#luhkie:stoerre#luhk NUMTAGie ;

LEXICON TJUETIE
tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuetie FINAL1 ;
tjuetie:tjuet NUMTAGie ;
tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
tjuetie# AKTEF ;
tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
tjuatede+A+Ord:tjuatad ORDTAGODD ;
akte#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:akte#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
akte#tjuetie:akte#tjuet NUMTAGie ;
akte#tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
akte#tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
akte#tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
akte#tjuetie# AKTEF ;
akte#tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
nïmme:nïmm NUMTAGe ;
nïmme# LUHKIEF ;
nïmme# LUHKIE- ;
nïmme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nïmme# AKTEF ;
nïmme# 2TO9F ;
nymme:nymm NUMTAGe ;
nymme# LUHKIEF ;
nymme# LUHKIE- ;
nymme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nymme# AKTEF ;
nymme# 2TO9F ;
nomme:nomm NUMTAGe ;
nomme# LUHKIEF ;
nomme# LUHKIE- ;
nomme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nomme# AKTEF ;
nomme# 2TO9F ;
stoere#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoere#luhkie:stoere#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoere#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoere#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoere#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
stoerre#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoerre#luhkie:stoerre#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoerre#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9F ;




  






                  
                                      
!LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part 
! NAMÁK ;   ! tuvsánjienat, logigielat, etc. 
! SASJ ; 
! NounSecond ;! golmmačiegahas
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;   
! !tuvsán#geardásaš 
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ; 





! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

!LEXICON num-imprecise
